Oklahoma, session 2026, SB567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7101 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “covered entity” and “protected


health information” have the same meaning as provided by 45 C.F.R.,


Section 160.103.


B. A patient may request that a health care provider or other


covered entity restrict:


1. Disclosure of protected health information:


a. for treatment, payment, or health care operations,


b. to persons involved in the individual’s health care or


payment for health care, or

Req. No. 728 Page 1


c. to notify family members or others about the


individual’s general condition, location, or death; or


2. Disclosure to another covered entity of the patient’s name,


address, date of birth, contact information, Social Security number,


state identification information, or personal financial information


including, but not limited to, credit or debit card numbers and bank


account balances.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-728 DC 1/19/2025 5:38:52 AM





























Req. No. 728 Page 2